Hawaii statutes.
§281-106 Prosecutions not to exclude other
remedies affecting license or goods. The provisions in this chapter for
the imposition upon any licensee of the penalties by fine or imprisonment for
any violation of this chapter or of any rule or regulation made hereunder
having the force of law shall be in addition to and independent of any other
right of the liquor commission or the liquor control adjudication board under
this chapter to effect a suspension or revocation of the license of the
licensee and shall also be in addition to and independent of any proceeding to
effect the forfeiture of any liquor or other property belonging to the licensee
as contemplated by this chapter. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §65; RL 1935, §2633; RL
1945, §7285; RL 1955, §159-103; HRS §281-106; am L 1998, c 249, §18]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next